Missouri, session 2026, SB1108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 214.270 and 214.389, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 214.270, 214.272, and 214.389, to read as
follows:
214.270. As used in sections 214.270 to 214.410, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Agent" or "authorized agent", any person
empowered by the cemetery operator to represent the operator
in dealing with the general public, including owners of the
burial space in the cemetery;
(2) "Burial merchandise", a monument, marker,
memorial, tombstone, headstone, urn, outer burial container,
or similar article [which] that may contain specific
lettering, shape, color, or design as specified by the
purchaser;
(3) "Burial space", one or more than one plot, grave,
mausoleum, crypt, lawn, surface lawn crypt, niche, or space
used or intended for the interment of the human dead;
(4) "Cemetery", property restricted in use for the
interment of the human dead by formal dedication or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1108 2
reservation by deed but shall not include any of the
foregoing held or operated by the state or federal
government or any political subdivision thereof, any
incorporated city or town, any county, or any religious
organization, cemetery association, or fraternal society
holding the same for sale solely to members and their
immediate families;
(5) "Cemetery association", any number of persons who
shall have associated themselves by articles of agreement in
writing as a not-for-profit association or organization,
whether incorporated or unincorporated, formed for the
purpose of ownership, preservation, care, maintenance,
adornment, and administration of a cemetery. Cemetery
associations shall be governed by a board of directors.
Directors shall serve without compensation;
(6) "Cemetery operator" or "operator", any person who
owns, controls, operates, or manages a cemetery;
(7) "Cemetery prearranged contract", any contract with
a cemetery or cemetery operator for burial merchandise or
burial services covered by sections 214.270 to 214.410
[which] that is entered into before the death of the
individual for whom the burial merchandise or burial
services are intended;
(8) "Cemetery service" or "burial service", those
services performed by a cemetery owner or operator licensed
as an endowed care or nonendowed cemetery including setting
a monument or marker, setting a tent, excavating a grave,
interment, entombment, inurnment, setting a vault, or other
related services within the cemetery;
(9) "Columbarium", a building or structure for the
inurnment of cremated human remains;

SB 1108 3
(10) "Community mausoleum", a mausoleum containing a
substantial area of enclosed space and having either a
heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system;
(11) "Department", department of commerce and
insurance;
(12) "Developed acreage", the area [which] that has
been platted into grave spaces and has been developed with
roads, paths, features, or ornamentations and in which
burials can be made;
(13) "Director", director of the division of
professional registration;
(14) "Division", division of professional registration;
(15) "Endowed care", the maintenance, repair, and care
of all burial space subject to the endowment within a
cemetery, including any improvements made for the benefit of
such burial space. Endowed care shall include the general
overhead expenses needed to accomplish such maintenance,
repair, care, and improvements. Endowed care shall include
the terms perpetual care, permanent care, continual care,
eternal care, care of duration, or any like term;
(16) "Endowed care cemetery", a cemetery, or a section
of a cemetery, [which] that represents itself as offering
endowed care and [which] that complies with the provisions
of sections 214.270 to 214.410;
(17) "Endowed care fund", "endowed care trust", or
"trust", any cash or cash equivalent, to include any income
therefrom, impressed with a trust by the terms of any gift,
grant, contribution, payment, devise, or bequest to an
endowed care cemetery, or its endowed care trust, or funds
to be delivered to an endowed care cemetery's trust received
pursuant to a contract and accepted by any endowed care
cemetery operator or [his] the operator's agent. This

SB 1108 4
definition includes the terms endowed care funds,
maintenance funds, memorial care funds, perpetual care
funds, or any like term;
(18) "Escrow account", an account established in lieu
of an endowed care fund as provided under section 214.330 or
an account used to hold deposits under section 214.387;
(19) "Escrow agent", an attorney, title company,
certified public accountant, or other person authorized by
the division to exercise escrow powers under the laws of
this state;
(20) "Escrow agreement", an agreement subject to
approval by the office between an escrow agent and a
cemetery operator or its agent or related party with common
ownership[,] to receive and administer payments under
cemetery prearranged contracts sold by the cemetery operator;
(21) "Family burial ground", a cemetery in which no
burial space is sold to the public and in which interments
are restricted to persons related by blood or marriage;
(22) "Fraternal cemetery", a cemetery owned, operated,
controlled, or managed by any fraternal organization or
100 auxiliary organizations thereof, in which the sale of burial
101 space is restricted solely to its members and their
102 immediate families;
103 (23) "Garden mausoleum", a mausoleum without a
104 substantial area of enclosed space and having its crypt and
105 niche fronts open to the atmosphere. Ventilation of the
106 crypts by forced air or otherwise does not constitute a
107 garden mausoleum as a community mausoleum;
108 (24) "Government cemetery", or "municipal cemetery", a
109 cemetery owned, operated, controlled, or managed by the
110 federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of

SB 1108 5
111 the state, including a county or municipality or
112 instrumentality thereof;
113 (25) "Grave" or "plot", a place of ground in a
114 cemetery, used or intended to be used for burial of human
115 remains;
116 (26) "Human and pet cemetery", a tract of real estate
117 separate from a cemetery in which both human remains and the
118 remains of creatures other than human may be interred and
119 memorialized at the discretion of the lot holder and subject
120 to the rules of the human and pet cemetery. Burial space in
121 a human and pet cemetery shall have the same meaning as
122 defined in this section but be applicable to pets as well as
123 human dead;
124 (27) "Human remains", the body of a deceased person in
125 any state of decomposition, as well as cremated remains;
126 [(27)] (28) "Inurnment", placing an urn containing
127 cremated remains in a burial space;
128 [(28)] (29) "Lawn crypt", a burial vault or other
129 permanent container for a casket [which] that is permanently
130 installed below ground prior to the time of the actual
131 interment. A lawn crypt may permit single or multiple
132 interments in a grave space;
133 [(29)] (30) "Mausoleum", a structure or building for
134 the entombment of human remains in crypts;
135 [(30)] (31) "Niche", a space in a columbarium used or
136 intended to be used for inurnment of cremated remains;
137 [(31)] (32) "Nonendowed care cemetery", or "nonendowed
138 cemetery", a cemetery or a section of a cemetery for which
139 no endowed care trust fund has been established in
140 accordance with sections 214.270 to 214.410;
141 [(32)] (33) "Office", the office of endowed care
142 cemeteries within the division of professional registration;

SB 1108 6
143 [(33)] (34) "Owner of burial space", a person to whom
144 the cemetery operator or [his] the operator's authorized
145 agent has transferred the right of use of burial space;
146 [(34)] (35) "Person", an individual, corporation,
147 partnership, joint venture, association, trust, or any other
148 legal entity;
149 [(35)] (36) "Registry", the list of cemeteries
150 maintained in the division office for public review. The
151 division may charge a fee for copies of the registry;
152 [(36)] (37) "Religious cemetery", a cemetery owned,
153 operated, controlled, or managed by any church, convention
154 of churches, religious order, or affiliated auxiliary
155 thereof in which the sale of burial space is restricted
156 solely to its members and their immediate families;
157 [(37)] (38) "Surface lawn crypt", a sealed burial
158 chamber whose lid protrudes above the land surface;
159 [(38)] (39) "Total acreage", the entire tract [which]
160 that is dedicated to or reserved for cemetery purposes;
161 [(39)] (40) "Trustee of an endowed care fund", the
162 separate legal entity qualified under section 214.330
163 appointed as trustee of an endowed care fund.
214.272. A human and pet cemetery shall be treated as
a cemetery under sections 214.270 to 214.410 for purposes of
licensing and endowed care.
214.389. 1. The division may direct a trustee,
financial institution, or escrow agent to suspend
distribution from an endowed care trust fund or escrow
account if the cemetery operator does not have a current and
active cemetery operator license, has failed to file an
annual report, or if, after an audit or examination, the
division determines there is a deficiency in an endowed care
trust fund or escrow account maintained under section

SB 1108 7
214.330 and the cemetery operator has failed to file a
corrective action plan detailing how the deficiency shall be
remedied. For purposes of this section, a deficiency shall
only be deemed to exist if, after an audit or examination,
the division determines a cemetery operator has failed to
deposit the total aggregate of funds required to be
deposited in trust or an escrow account pursuant to section
214.320 or subsection 1 of section 214.335, or has received
disbursements from the trust or escrow account in excess of
what is permitted under section 214.330. No deficiency
shall be deemed to be created by fluctuations in the value
of investments held in trust or escrow.
2. The division shall provide written notification to
the cemetery operator and the trustee, financial
institution, or escrow agent within fourteen days of
discovering a potential violation as described in this
section. Upon receipt of written notification from the
division, the cemetery operator shall have sixty days to
cure any alleged violations or deficiencies cited in the
notification without a suspension of distribution. If,
after the sixty-day time period, the division [feels] finds
the cemetery operator has not cured the alleged violations
or deficiencies cited in the notification, the division may
send a notice of suspension to the cemetery operator that
the division is ordering a suspension of distribution as
described in this section. In the event of a suspension of
distribution, the amount of any distribution suspended shall
become principal, with credit against the deficiency, unless
the cemetery operator files an appeal with a court of
competent jurisdiction or with the administrative hearing
commission, as provided herein. In the event of an appeal,
a cemetery operator may request the court or administrative

SB 1108 8
hearing commission stay the suspension of distribution after
a showing of necessity and good cause or authorize payment
from the endowed care trust fund or escrow account for
necessary expenses from any amount subject to distribution.
3. Upon receipt of an order from the division
suspending distribution pursuant to this section, a trustee,
financial institution, or escrow agent shall immediately
suspend distribution as required by the order. A trustee,
financial institution, or escrow agent shall be exempt from
liability for failure to distribute funds as ordered by the
division.
4. A cemetery operator may appeal an order suspending
distribution pursuant to this section to the administrative
hearing commission. The administrative hearing commission
shall receive notice of such appeal within thirty days from
the date the notice of suspension was mailed by certified
mail. Failure of a person whose license was suspended to
notify the administrative hearing commission of his or her
intent to appeal waives all rights to appeal the
suspension. Upon notice of such person's intent to appeal,
a hearing shall be held before the administrative hearing
commission pursuant to chapter 621.
5. A cemetery operator may apply for reinstatement of
distributions upon demonstration that the deficiencies or
other problems have been cured or that the operator has
otherwise come into compliance.
6. The division may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section

SB 1108 9
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2010, shall be invalid and void.
✓